dictionaries/ru_RU/ru_RU_oo3.aff
SET KOI8-R

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z   ЩК   П            [МОТФЧ]ЩК
SFX Z   ЙК   П            ШЛЙК
SFX Z   ЙК   Й            [ГУ]ЛЙК
SFX Z   ЙК   Е            ЭЙК
